Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-487
Districts; division; part taken over by United States; sale of schoolhouse.

Whenever, due to the division of any district or due to a district or any part thereof being taken over by the United States for any defense, flood control, irrigation, or war project, the schoolhouse, schoolhouse site, or other property of such district is no longer conveniently located for school purposes or desired to be retained by the district in which it is situated, the county sheriff of the county in which such schoolhouse, schoolhouse site, or other property is located may, when ordered by the district, advertise and sell the same at public or private sale and apportion the proceeds. When sold at private sale, the sale shall not be binding until approved by the district interested.

Laws 1881, c. 78, subdivision I, § 13, p. 335;

R.S.1913, § 6712;

C.S.1922, § 6250;

C.S.1929, § 79-113;

Laws 1943, c. 197, § 2, p. 664;

R.S.1943, § 79-126;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 55, p. 711;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-416;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 236;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 65.

Apportionment of assets of school districts upon partial or complete merger, division, or annexation decided. School Dist. No. 74 of Hall County v. School Dist. of Grand Island, 186 Neb. 728, 186 N.W.2d 485 (1971).